languages/apertium-nog/tests/jot-phon.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../nog.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../nog.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  "[twol] forms where й just deletes":
    суьй<v><tv><aor><p1><sg> : суьемен

  "[twol] forms where й deletes and triggers я":
    кой<v><tv><aor><p1><sg> : кояман

  "[twol] forms where й doesn't delete":
    суьй<v><tv><ifi><p1><sg> : суьйдим
    кой<v><tv><ifi><p1><sg> : койдым
